th: รองรับ Aftertouch: Channel Aftertouch; ไม่มี; Polyphonic Aftertouch; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Podpora za Aftertouch: Aftertouch kanala; Brez; Polifonični aftertouch; Drugo
nb: Aftertouch-støtte: Kanal-aftertouch; Ingen; Polyfonisk aftertouch; Annet
de: Aftertouch-Unterstützung: Channel-Aftertouch; Keine; Polyphoner Aftertouch; Andere
hu: Aftertouch-támogatás: Csatornánkénti aftertouch; Nincs; Polifónikus aftertouch; Egyéb
pt-PT: Suporte de aftertouch: Aftertouch de canal; Nenhum; Aftertouch polifónico; Outro
zh-TW: 觸後支援: 通道觸後; 無; 多音觸後; 其他
nl: Aftertouch-ondersteuning: Kanaal-aftertouch; Geen; Polyfone aftertouch; Overig
fr: Prise en charge de l’aftertouch: Aftertouch de canal; Aucun; Aftertouch polyphonique; Autre
pl: Obsługa funkcji Aftertouch: Channel aftertouch; Brak; Polifoniczny aftertouch; Inne
ru: Поддержка послекасания: Канальное послекасание; Нет; Полифоническое послекасание; Другое
ja: アフタータッチサポート: チャンネルアフタータッチ; なし; ポリフォニックアフタータッチ; その他
vi: Hỗ trợ Aftertouch: Aftertouch theo kênh; Không có; Aftertouch đa âm; Khác
it: Assistenza Aftertouch: Aftertouch di canale; Nessuno; Aftertouch polifonico; Altro
tr: Aftertouch desteği: Kanal aftertouch; Yok; Polifonik aftertouch; Diğer
zh-CN: 触后支持: 通道触后; 无; 复音触后; 其他
hr-HR: Podrška efekta aftertouch: Channel aftertouch; Nema; Polifonični aftertouch; Ostalo
lt-LT: „Aftertouch“ palaikymas: Kanalo „aftertouch“; Nėra; Polifoninis „aftertouch“; Kita
da: Aftertouch-understøttelse: Channel aftertouch; Ingen; Polyfonisk aftertouch; Anden
es: Compatibilidad para aftertouch: Aftertouch de canal; Ninguno; Aftertouch polifónico; Otro
ko: 애프터터치 지원: 채널 애프터터치; 없음; 폴리포닉 애프터터치; 기타
en: Aftertouch support: Channel aftertouch; None; Polyphonic aftertouch; Other
sv: Aftertouch-support: Channel aftertouch; Ingen; Polyphonic aftertouch; Övrigt
cs: Podpora Aftertouch: Kanálový aftertouch; Žádná; Polyfonní aftertouch; Ostatní
ro-RO: Asistență pentru aftertouch: Aftertouch pe canal; Niciunul; Aftertouch polifonic; Altele
fi: Aftertouch-tuki: Kanavakohtainen jälkikosketus; Ei mitään; Moninäkökulmainen jälkikosketus; Muu
sk-SK: Podpora Aftertouch: Channel aftertouch; Žiadna; Polyfonický aftertouch; Iné
bg-BG: Поддръжка на Aftertouch: Канален афтъртач; Няма; Полифоничен афтъртач; Други
pt-BR: Aftertouch: Channel aftertouch; Nenhum; Polyphonic aftertouch; Outros
el: Υποστήριξη Aftertouch: Aftertouch καναλιού; Κανένα; Πολυφωνικό aftertouch; Άλλο